District of Columbia statutes.
24-113

Data collection.

(a)

Data for Attorney General. —

The Commission, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the District of Columbia Department of Corrections, and other agencies as necessary shall provide to the Attorney General such data as are requested in furtherance of this Act.

(b)

Superior Court. —

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in connection with defendants sentenced in such Court, shall provide to the Commission and the Attorney General such data as are requested for planning, statistical analysis or projecting future prison population levels.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11213
1981 Ed., § 24-1213.
“This Act,” referred to in (a), is the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 712.